Washington statutes.
RCW 18.34.141

License required.

No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a dispensing optician without first having a valid license to do so.

[ 1987 c 150 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.